Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB594.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Complex Wheelchair Quality Assurance Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Beneficiary." An individual covered under a government program."Complex wheelchair." A wheelchair owned by a beneficiary or an insured in which all of the following apply:(1) The wheelchair is originally designed, manufactured, individually configured, adjusted or modified for a specific 123456789101112131415161718 individual to meet the individual's unique medical, physical or functional needs and capacities.(2) The wheelchair is primarily used to serve a medical, physical or functional purpose and is generally not useful to an individual in the absence of disability, illness, injury or other medical condition.(3) The wheelchair requires certain services to ensure appropriate use, including at least one of the following:(i) An evaluation of the features and functions to the specific individual who will use the wheelchair.(ii) Configuring, fitting, programming, adjusting or adapting the particular wheelchair for use by the individual."Costs incurred." The real costs of providing a semiannual evaluation of a complex wheelchair, which shall include:(1) Physical checks, adjustments or use of a complex wheelchair.(2) Labor costs.(3) Contacting, driving to or consulting with a beneficiary regarding the appropriate use of the complex wheelchair."Department." The Department of Human Services of the Commonwealth."Government program." Either of the following:(1) The medical assistance program established under the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code.(2) The children's health insurance program established under Article XXIII-A of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.20250SB0594PN0602 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Health insurance policy." As follows:(1) An individual or group insurance policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan offered, issued or renewed by a health insurer that provides medical or health care coverage, including emergency services.(2) The term does not include:(i) An accident only policy.(ii) A credit only policy.(iii) A long-term care or disability income policy.(iv) A specified disease policy.(v) A Medicare supplement policy.(vi) A TriCARE policy, including a Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) supplement policy.(vii) A fixed indemnity policy.(viii) A hospital indemnity policy.(ix) A dental only policy.(x) A vision only policy.(xi) A workers' compensation policy.(xii) An automobile medical payment policy.(xiii) A homeowners' insurance policy.(xiv) Any other similar policy providing for limited benefits."Health insurer." An entity licensed by the Insurance Department with accident and health authority to issue a health insurance policy that is offered or governed under any of the following:(1) The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including section 630 and Article XXIV of that act.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), 20250SB0594PN0602 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(3) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations)."Insured." An individual covered under a health insurance policy."Service provider." An entity with the capability of providing well-visits and which is enrolled as a Medicare durable medical equipment supplier or a Pennsylvania Medicaid supplier."Well-visit." An evaluation of a complex wheelchair and the beneficiary's or insured's use of the complex wheelchair by a repair technician working on behalf of a service provider, which shall include the following:(1) Assessment and evaluation of the physical condition of the complex wheelchair.(2) Adjustments to the condition of the complex wheelchair.Section 3. Well-visit coverage.A health insurance policy or government program shall provide coverage for complex wheelchair maintenance and well-visits on at least a semiannual basis, including costs incurred during the complex wheelchair maintenance and telehealth well-visits. Consistent with Federal law and regulations, government programs shall honor telehealth well-visits for complex wheelchairs as well-visits under the regulation of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, as published in 86 Fed. Reg. 221, 64996 (November 19, 2021) or any regulatory successor allowing for telehealth visits.Section 4. Consumer notice.20250SB0594PN0602 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 An insurer or government program shall provide an individual using a complex wheelchair annual notification of the coverage specified under section 3 from the insurer or government program providing coverage.Section 5. Waiver.The department shall seek the appropriate Federal waiver through the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services necessary to carry out the provisions of this act for all Medicaid-eligible individuals who utilize a complex wheelchair.Section 6. Rules and regulations.(a) Authorization.--The department and the Insurance Department may each promulgate or adopt rules and regulations as may be necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this act.(b) Temporary regulations.--(1) In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this act, the department and the Insurance Department may each issue temporary regulations. The following shall apply to temporary regulations:(i) The department and the Insurance Department must issue the temporary regulations within six months of the effective date of this subsection. Regulations adopted after this six-month period shall be promulgated as provided by statute.(ii) Notice of the temporary regulations shall be transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(iii) The department and the Insurance Department shall each post their temporary regulations on their 20250SB0594PN0602 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 publicly accessible Internet websites.(iv) The temporary regulations shall expire no later than two years following publication of the temporary regulations in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) The temporary regulations under paragraph (1) shall be exempt from the following:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(c) Contents of rules and regulations of department.--Rules and regulations of the department under this section may:(1) Establish guidelines for a well-visit in accordance with this act, including required components of the well-visit and the competencies needed by the service provider to perform the well-visit. The department shall:(i) Provide any required changes to the guidelines to insurers, service providers and individuals using complex wheelchairs.(ii) Post the guidelines, and any changes to the guidelines, on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(2) Establish a methodology for reimbursements by a 20250SB0594PN0602 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 government program to a service provider regarding a complex wheelchair well-visit. The methodology must:(i) Recognize the costs incurred to provide a well-visit under which the government program shall pay all reasonably necessary costs associated with the well-visit, subject to any copayment, coinsurance or deductible.(ii) Include:(A) An explanation of how the schedule for reimbursement rates was established, including the factors, data and sources used to establish the methodology.(B) The elements needed to provide a well-visit.(C) The documentation necessary for a service provider to receive reimbursement for the well-visit.(d) Contents of rules and regulations by Insurance Department.--Rules and regulations of the Insurance Department under this section shall establish procedures regarding payments for a complex wheelchair well-visit, which shall address the fair reimbursement of costs incurred by a service provider in providing the well-visit to an insured who owns the complex wheelchair and is covered under a health insurance policy.(e) Permanent regulations.--Prior to the expiration of the temporary regulations, the department and the Insurance Department shall each propose for approval permanent regulations as provided by statute. The proposed permanent regulations shall be consistent with subsections (c) and (d) and may be the same as the temporary regulations.Section 7. Review.(a) Department review.--The department shall undertake a 20250SB0594PN0602 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 review of the methodology under section 6(c)(2) at least once every five years.(b) Public review.--The department shall seek public review and comment of the methodology and reimbursement rates.(c) Notice.--If the department intends or does not intend to make changes to the methodology or reimbursement rates during the review, the department shall transmit notice of that determination to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 8. Enforcement.This act shall be enforced by the department and the Insurance Department in accordance with the following:(1) The department shall:(i) Follow the complaint procedures under 55 Pa. Code § 107.4(c) (relating to procedures to assure nondiscrimination of participating agencies, institutions, organizations and vendors) for complaints arising under this act.(ii) Ensure that service providers receiving medical assistance payments are not engaged in activities prohibited by 55 Pa Code § 1101.75 (relating to provider prohibited acts).(2) The Insurance Department shall enforce provisions for private insurers in accordance with the act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.589, No.205), known as the Unfair Insurance Practices Act.Section 9. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to limit benefits otherwise available to an individual under a health insurance 20250SB0594PN0602 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 policy or government program.Section 10. Applicability.This act shall apply as follows:(1) For health insurance policies for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this section.(2) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this section.Section 11. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0594PN0602 - 9 - 123456789101112131415